Utah statutes.
63B-19-102.   Revenue bond authorizations -- Board of Regents.
(1)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  the Board of Regents, on behalf of Weber State University, may issue,
sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of Weber
State University to borrow money on the credit, revenues, and reserves of the
university, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the cost
of demolition, replacement, and construction of student housing on the Ogden
campus;
(b)  Weber State University use student housing rental fees and parking fees
as the primary revenue sources for repayment of any obligation created under
authority of this section;
(c)  the maximum amount of revenue bonds or evidences of indebtedness
authorized by this section is $15,000,000, together with other amounts
necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any
debt service reserve requirements;
(d)  the university may plan, design, and construct the Ogden campus housing
project subject to the requirements of Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building
Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management; and
(e)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance
costs or capital improvements.
(2)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  the Board of Regents, on behalf of the University of Utah, may issue,
sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of the
University of Utah to borrow money on the credit, revenues, and reserves of
the university, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the
cost of purchasing the Ambassador Building from Salt Lake County;
(b)  the University of Utah use clinical revenues and other institutional
funds as the primary revenue source for repayment of any obligation created
under authority of this section;
(c)  the maximum amount of revenue bonds or evidences of indebtedness
authorized by this section is $12,000,000, together with other amounts
necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any
debt service reserve requirements; and
(d)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance
costs or capital improvements.
(3)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  the Board of Regents, on behalf of the University of Utah, may issue,
sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of the
University of Utah to borrow money on the credit, revenues, and reserves of
the university, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the
cost of purchasing the Orthopaedics Building from the Utah Orthopaedic
Foundation;
(b)  the University of Utah use clinical revenues and other institutional
funds as the primary revenue sources for repayment of any obligation created
under authority of this section;
(c)  the maximum amount of revenue bonds or evidences of indebtedness
authorized by this section is $25,000,000, together with other amounts
necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any
debt service reserve requirements; and
(d)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance
costs or capital improvements.
(4)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  the Board of Regents, on behalf of the University of Utah, may issue,
sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of the
University of Utah to borrow money on the credit, revenues, and reserves of
the university, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the
cost of constructing an expansion of the University Guest House;
(b)  the University of Utah use room rental, meeting room rental, and the sale
of ancillary services as the primary revenue sources for repayment of any
obligation created under authority of this section;
(c)  the maximum amount of revenue bonds or evidences of indebtedness
authorized by this section is $10,000,000, together with other amounts
necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any
debt service reserve requirements;
(d)  the university may plan, design, and construct the expansion of the
University Guest House project subject to the requirements of Title 63A,
Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and
Management; and
(e)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance
costs or capital improvements.
(5)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  the Board of Regents, on behalf of the University of Utah, may issue,
sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of the
University of Utah to borrow money on the credit, revenues, and reserves of
the university, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the
cost of constructing an Ambulatory Care Complex;
(b)  the University of Utah use clinical revenues and other institutional
funds as the primary revenue sources for repayment of any obligation created
under authority of this section;
(c)  the maximum amount of revenue bonds or evidences of indebtedness
authorized by this section is $119,541,000, together with other amounts
necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any
debt service reserve requirements;
(d)  the university may plan, design, and construct the Ambulatory Care
Complex project subject to the requirements of Title 63A, Chapter 5, State
Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management; and
(e)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance
costs or capital improvements.
(6)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  the Board of Regents, on behalf of Southern Utah University, may issue,
sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of Southern
Utah University to borrow money on the credit, revenues, and reserves of the
university, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the cost
of constructing the Southern Utah Museum of Arts in conjunction with other
funds authorized in Subsection 63B-19-201(1);
(b)  Southern Utah University use student fees as the primary revenue sources
for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this section;
(c)  the maximum amount of revenue bonds or evidences of indebtedness
authorized by this section is $2,500,000, together with other amounts
necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any
debt service reserve requirements;
(d)  the university may plan, design, and construct the Southern Utah Museum
of Arts project subject to the requirements of Title 63A, Chapter 5, State
Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management; and
(e)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance
costs or capital improvements.
